Connecticut, session 2026, HB05367.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Unauthorized person" means an individual who has entered, or
remains in, residential property without the consent of the owner or
lawful occupant;
(2) "Dwelling unit" has the same meaning as provided in section 47a-
1 of the general statutes;
(3) "Police officer" means a sworn member of the Division of State
Police or of a municipal police department; and
(4) "Law enforcement agency" means the Division of State Police
within the Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection or
an organized municipal police department.
sHB5367 / File No. 166 1

sHB5367 File No. 166
(b) A real property owner, or the authorized agent of the real
property owner, may request the law enforcement agency for the
municipality in which the property is located to immediately remove a
person unlawfully occupying a dwelling unit pursuant to this section if
all of the following conditions are met:
(1) The requestor is the real property owner or authorized agent of
the real property owner;
(2) The real property that is being occupied includes a dwelling unit;
(3) An unauthorized person has unlawfully entered and remained or
continues to reside on the real property owner's property;
(4) The real property was not open to members of the public at the
time the unauthorized person entered;
(5) The real property owner has directed the unauthorized person to
leave the property;
(6) The unauthorized person is not a current or former tenant
pursuant to a written or oral rental agreement authorized by the real
property owner;
(7) The unauthorized person is not an immediate family member of
the real property owner; and
(8) There is no pending litigation related to the real property between
the real property owner and any known unauthorized person.
(c) To request the immediate removal of an unauthorized person who
is unlawfully occupying a residential property, the real property owner,
or the authorized agent of the real property owner, shall submit a
request to the law enforcement agency of the municipality in which the
real property is located by presenting a (1) signed affidavit, and (2) copy
of the property owner's valid government-issued identification or, in the
case of an authorized agent, documents evidencing the agent's authority
to act on behalf of the property owner. The affidavit shall certify the
sHB5367 / File No. 166 2

sHB5367 File No. 166
following:
(A) That the requestor is the real property owner or owner's
authorized agent of the real property from which removal is sought;
(B) The date on which the real property owner obtained title to the
real property from which removal is sought;
(C) That an unauthorized person has unlawfully entered the property
and unlawfully remains on the property after being directed to leave the
property;
(D) That the property was not open to members of the public at the
time the unauthorized person entered;
(E) That the unauthorized person is not an immediate family member
of the real property owner;
(F) That the unauthorized person is not an owner or co-owner of the
property and has not been listed on the title to the property unless the
person has engaged in title fraud;
(G) That there is no litigation related to the real property pending
between the real property owner and any unauthorized person who is
unlawfully occupying the property; and
(H) That the unauthorized person being removed from the property
may bring a cause of action against the requestor for any false
statements made in the request and affidavit and that the requestor may
be liable for actual damages, penalties, costs and reasonable attorney
fees.
(d) Upon receipt of the request, the law enforcement agency shall
verify that the person submitting the request is the record owner of the
real property, or the authorized agent of the owner of such property,
and appears otherwise entitled to relief under this section. If verified,
the local law enforcement agency shall, without delay, serve a notice to
immediately vacate on each unauthorized person who is unlawfully
sHB5367 / File No. 166 3

sHB5367 File No. 166
occupying the property and shall put the owner in possession of the real
property. Service may be accomplished by hand delivery of the notice
to the unauthorized person or by posting the notice on the front door or
entrance of the property. The police officer serving such notice shall also
attempt to verify the identities of all persons occupying the property and
note the identities on the return of service. If appropriate, the police
officer may arrest any unauthorized person found on the property for
trespass, outstanding warrants or any other legal cause.
(e) A person may bring a civil cause of action for wrongful removal
under this section. A person harmed by a wrongful removal under this
section may be restored to possession of the real property and may
recover actual costs and damages incurred, statutory damages equal to
triple the fair market rent of the property, court costs and reasonable
attorney's fees.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
References to "police department" were changed to "law enforcement
agency" and "police officer" and a definition for such terms added, for
consistency with standard drafting conventions; references to "property
owner" were changed to "real property owner" and references to
"property" were changed to "real property" for clarity and consistency.
HSG Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5367 / File No. 166 4

sHB5367 File No. 166
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact:
Municipalities Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
All Municipalities Potential Minimal Minimal
Savings
Explanation
The bill, which creates a process for the removal of unauthorized
persons from residential property, results in a potential savings to
municipalities related to a possible decrease in evictions.
To the extent the bill results in fewer evictions, there may be a
potential savings to municipalities associated with storing fewer
possessions of evicted tenants, beginning in FY 27.
The bill also allows individuals who are allegedly wrongfully
removed to bring a civil cause of action, which does not result in a fiscal
impact. The court system disposes of over 250,000 cases annually and
the number of cases is not anticipated to be great enough to have a
material change on court operations.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to the actual number of evictions.
sHB5367 / File No. 166 5

sHB5367 File No. 166
OLR Bill Analysis
sHB 5367
AN ACT CONCERNING THE REMOVAL OF UNAUTHORIZED
PERSONS FROM RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY.